Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.475, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Fish houses, dark houses, and shelters; residents. new text begin (a) new text end Fees for the following licenses are: (1) annual for a fish house, dark house, or shelter that is not rented, $15; (2) annual for a fish house, dark house, or shelter that is rented, $30; (3) three-year for a fish house, dark house, or shelter that is not rented, $42; and (4) three-year for a fish house, dark house, or shelter that is rented, $87. new text begin (b) A $10 surcharge must be added to all licenses under paragraph (a) and must be deposited into the Keep it Clean account under section 97C.364, subdivision 3. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.475, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Fish houses, dark houses, and shelters; nonresident. new text begin (a) new text end Fees for fish house, dark house, and shelter licenses for a nonresident are: (1) annual, $37; (2) seven consecutive days selected by the licensee, $21; and (3) three-year, $111. new text begin (b) A $10 surcharge must be added to all licenses under paragraph (a) and must be deposited into the Keep it Clean account under section 97C.364, subdivision 3. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [97C.364] KEEP IT CLEAN PROGRAM; GRANTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner, in consultation with the Board of Water and Soil Resources and the commissioners of the Pollution Control Agency and health, must develop and administer a statewide Keep it Clean program to prevent water pollution due to garbage and human waste left on the ice of state waters during winter use activities. As part of the program, the commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) coordinate with and provide outreach to local units of government and nongovernmental organizations; new text end new text begin (2) facilitate other state agencies' participation in local programs and projects; new text end new text begin (3) coordinate media efforts; new text end new text begin (4) establish a statewide education campaign; and new text end new text begin (5) develop and administer a grant program according to subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grants. new text end new text begin The commissioner must develop a grant program to provide money to local units of government and nongovernmental organizations to implement local programs to prevent water pollution due to garbage and human waste left on the ice of state waters during winter use activities. Activities eligible for grants under this subdivision include but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) installing and maintaining public, sanitary, winterized dumping stations at accessible, designated locations near lake access points and major travel corridors; new text end new text begin (2) providing dedicated seasonal services, facilities, and containers to transport and dispose of human and pet biowaste at preapproved locations; new text end new text begin (3) increasing enforcement of related state and local ordinances by providing the resources needed to increase state and local law enforcement patrols during the winter months and establishing volunteer county programs for winter lake patrol; new text end new text begin (4) education and outreach efforts promoting local and regional Keep it Clean activities; new text end new text begin (5) organizing spring cleanup efforts, excluding cleanup efforts after significant events, including but not limited to festivals, ice fishing contests, and ice races; and new text end new text begin (6) local advertising and marketing efforts to educate and promote Keep it Clean messaging and provide information about laws and regulations regarding Keep it Clean. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Keep it Clean account. new text end new text begin The Keep it Clean account is created in the state treasury in the game and fish fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Receipts. new text end new text begin Money received from surcharges on fish houses, dark houses, and shelters under section 97A.475, subdivisions 11 and 12, must be deposited in the Keep it Clean account. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Use of account money. new text end new text begin Money credited to the Keep it Clean account in subdivision 3 must be used for managing the Keep it Clean program and grants under this section. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources to develop and administer the Keep it Clean program under Minnesota Statutes, section 97C.364. Of this amount, at least $....... is available for grants. new text end new text begin (b) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the Keep it Clean account in the game and fish fund to the commissioner of natural resources to develop and administer the Keep it Clean program under Minnesota Statutes, section 97C.364. Of this amount, at least $....... is available for grants. new text end